Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,247
Food Salvage Code, defined.

Food Salvage Code shall mean the 1984 Recommendation of the Association of Food and Drug Officials and United States Department of Health and Human Services entitled Model Food Salvage Code, as it exists on June 8, 1985, except sections 1-102(h), 6-401, 6-501, 8-101, 8-201, 11-101, 12-101 through 12-106, 12-201, 12-202, 12-301, 12-401, 12-402, and 12-601 of such code.

Laws 1981, LB 487, § 9;

Laws 1985, LB 460, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-216.05;

Laws 1991, LB 358, § 16;

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 57.